Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-837
Remedies; how administered and enforced.

(a) The remedies provided by sections 76-825 to 76-894 shall be administered to the end that the aggrieved party is put in as good a position as if the other party had fully performed. However, consequential or special damages may not be awarded except as specifically provided in sections 76-825 to 76-894 or by other rule of law.

(b) Any right or obligation declared by sections 76-825 to 76-894 is enforceable by judicial proceeding.

Laws 1983, LB 433, § 13.